Utah statutes.
78B-1-147.   Witnesses -- Fees in civil cases  -- How paid -- Taxed as costs.

(1)  The fees and compensation of witnesses in all civil causes shall be paid by the party who causes the witnesses to attend.  A person is not obliged to attend court in a civil cause when subpoenaed unless the person's:

(a)  fees for one day's attendance are tendered or paid on demand; or

(b)  fees for attendance for each day are tendered or paid on demand.

(2)  The fees of witnesses paid in civil causes may be taxed as costs against the losing party.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

